Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1106
Federal Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998; compliance; effect.

A controller or processor that complies with the verifiable parental consent requirements of the federal Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., and the rules, regulations, and guidance adopted and promulgated under such act as such act, rules, regulations, and guidance existed on January 1, 2024, with respect to data collected online is considered to be in compliance with any requirement to obtain parental consent under the Data Privacy Act.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 6.